src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON I_17_3_31
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_5өөс_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_6өөр_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_10өө_204_v3_1_p;
LEXICON I_1_2_32
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_1_1_33
	Clit;
	S0_0_2д_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_2_2_34
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_p
	+Gen-ы:%>ы Clit;
	+Gen-ы:%>ы S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_10оо_203_v2_1_iх_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_2д_202_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_10оо_203_v2_1_iх_p
	+Refl-оо:%>хоо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_p
	+Kh-х:%>х Clit;
	+Kh-х:%>х S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_p
	+Poss-хон:%>хон Clit;
	+Poss-хон:%>хон S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_2д_202_v2_1_p
	+Dat-д:%>д Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>д S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_2д_202_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_2д_205_v2_1_iо_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_4ыг_205_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_5оос_205_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_6оор_205_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_7той_205_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_10оо_204_v2_1_p
	+Refl-оо:%>оо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_2д_205_v2_1_iо_p
	+Dat-д:%>од Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>од S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_2д_205_v2_1_iо;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_4ыг_205_v2_1_p
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг Clit;
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_4ыг_205_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_5оос_205_v2_1_p
	+Abl-оос:%>оос Clit;
	+Abl-оос:%>оос S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_5оос_205_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_6оор_205_v2_1_p
	+Ins-оор:%>оор Clit;
	+Ins-оор:%>оор S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_6оор_205_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_7той_205_v2_1_p
	+Com-той:%>той Clit;
	+Com-той:%>той S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_7той_205_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_2д_205_v2_1_iо
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_2д_205_v2_1_iо_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_2д_205_v2_1_iо_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p
	+Refl-оо:%>оо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_4ыг_205_v2_1
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_4ыг_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_4ыг_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p
	+Refl-оо:%>оо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_5оос_205_v2_1
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_5оос_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_5оос_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p
	+Refl-оо:%>оо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_6оор_205_v2_1
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_6оор_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_6оор_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p
	+Refl-оо:%>оо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_7той_205_v2_1
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_7той_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_iг_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_11х_203_v2_1_203_7той_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_iг_p
	+Refl-оо:%>гоо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_10оо_204_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_1ы_205_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_2д_205_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_3оо_205_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_4ыг_205_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_5оос_205_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_6оор_205_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_7той_205_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_10оо_204_v1_1_p
	+Refl-оо:%>оо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_1ы_205_v2_1_p
	+Gen-ы:%>ы Clit;
	+Gen-ы:%>ы S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_1ы_205_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_2д_205_v2_1_p
	+Dat-д:%>д Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>д S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_2д_205_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_3оо_205_v2_1_p
	+Dat-оо:%>оо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_4ыг_205_v2_1_p
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг Clit;
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_4ыг_205_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_5оос_205_v2_1_p
	+Abl-оос:%>оос Clit;
	+Abl-оос:%>оос S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_5оос_205_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_6оор_205_v2_1_p
	+Ins-оор:%>оор Clit;
	+Ins-оор:%>оор S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_6оор_205_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_7той_205_v2_1_p
	+Com-той:%>той Clit;
	+Com-той:%>той S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_7той_205_v2_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_1ы_205_v2_1
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_1ы_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_iх_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_1ы_205_v2_1_205_11х_206_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_1ы_205_v2_1_205_12хон_206_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_1ы_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_iх_p
	+Refl-оо:%>хоо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_1ы_205_v2_1_205_11х_206_v2_1_p
	+Kh-х:%>х Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_1ы_205_v2_1_205_12хон_206_v2_1_p
	+Poss-хон:%>хон Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_2д_205_v2_1
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_2д_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_2д_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p
	+Refl-оо:%>оо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_4ыг_205_v2_1
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_4ыг_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_4ыг_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p
	+Refl-оо:%>оо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_5оос_205_v2_1
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_5оос_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_5оос_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p
	+Refl-оо:%>оо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_6оор_205_v2_1
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_6оор_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_6оор_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_p
	+Refl-оо:%>оо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_7той_205_v2_1
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_7той_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_iг_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_12хон_203_v2_1_203_7той_205_v2_1_205_10оо_206_v2_1_iг_p
	+Refl-оо:%>гоо Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_2д_202_v2_1
	S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_2д_202_v2_1_202_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ы_201_v2_1_201_2д_202_v2_1_202_10оо_204_v2_1_p
	+Refl-оо:%>оо Clit;
LEXICON I_2_1_35
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ы_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_2_4_36
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5ээс_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_6ээр_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_10ээ_204_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_p
	+Gen-ий:%>ий Clit;
	+Gen-ий:%>ий S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_10ээ_203_v4_1_iх_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_2д_202_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_10ээ_203_v4_1_iх_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>хээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_p
	+Kh-х:%>х Clit;
	+Kh-х:%>х S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_p
	+Poss-хэн:%>хэн Clit;
	+Poss-хэн:%>хэн S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_2д_202_v4_1_p
	+Dat-д:%>д Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>д S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_2д_202_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_10ээ_204_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1_iэ_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_4ийг_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_5ээс_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_10ээ_204_v4_1_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1_iэ_p
	+Dat-д:%>эд Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>эд S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1_iэ;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_4ийг_205_v4_1_p
	+Acc-ийг:%>ийг Clit;
	+Acc-ийг:%>ийг S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_4ийг_205_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_5ээс_205_v4_1_p
	+Abl-ээс:%>ээс Clit;
	+Abl-ээс:%>ээс S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_5ээс_205_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1_p
	+Ins-ээр:%>ээр Clit;
	+Ins-ээр:%>ээр S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1_p
	+Com-тэй:%>тэй Clit;
	+Com-тэй:%>тэй S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1_iэ
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1_iэ_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1_iэ_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_4ийг_205_v4_1
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_4ийг_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_4ийг_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_5ээс_205_v4_1
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_5ээс_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_5ээс_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_iг_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_iг_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>гээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_10ээ_204_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_1ий_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_3ээ_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_4ийг_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_5ээс_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_8лүгээ_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_9=рүү_205_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_10ээ_204_v4_1_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_1ий_205_v4_1_p
	+Gen-ий:%>ий Clit;
	+Gen-ий:%>ий S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_1ий_205_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1_p
	+Dat-д:%>д Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>д S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ий_201_v4_1_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_3ээ_205_v4_1_p
	+Dat-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
